Hawaii statutes.
§353-72 Pardons; reference to paroling
authority. The director of public safety and the Hawaii paroling authority
shall consider every application for pardon which may be referred to them by
the governor and shall furnish the governor, as soon as may be after such
reference, all information possible concerning the prisoner, together with a
recommendation as to the granting or refusing of the pardon. [L 1905, c 41, §5;
am imp L 1911, c 5, §2; RL 1925, §1545; am L 1931, c 129, pt of §1; RL 1935,
§§6410, 6419; RL 1945, §3965; RL 1955, §83-70; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§20; HRS §353-72; am L 1976, c 92, pt of §8; am L 1987, c 338, §10; am L
1989, c 211, §8]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next